District of Columbia statutes.
1-350.03

Imposition of costs and fees.

(a)

The Central Collection Unit may prescribe, impose, and collect fees from debtors to cover actual costs or expenses associated with the collection of delinquent debt.

(b)

In addition to the authority to impose and collect fees to cover actual costs or expenses associated with the collection of delinquent debt, the Central Collection Unit may prescribe and impose a fee to be paid by each person who tenders in payment of a financial obligation owed to the District, including a tax, assessment, fee, citation, or charge, a check that is subsequently dishonored or not duly paid, or whose delinquent debt is transferred and referred to the Central Collection Unit for action. The amount of the fee shall be set by regulations established by the Central Collection Unit.

Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 1044, 59 DCR 8025
This section is referenced in § 1-350.04.